Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3571
Hospital districts; bonds; issuance; statement; contents.

Each new bond issued under the provisions of sections 23-3570 to 23-3572 shall state therein (1) the object of its issuance, (2) the section or sections of the law under which the issuance thereof was made, including a statement that the issuance is made pursuant thereto, and (3) the number, date, and amount of the bond or bonds for which it is substituted. Such new bond shall not be delivered until the surrender of the bond or bonds so designated or until such bonds are called for redemption.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 18, p. 357;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.66.